Tennessee, session 114, SB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-105(a)(5), is amended by
deleting the language "sixty (60) days" and substituting "seventy-five (75) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1250
003212
- 1 -